Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,175
Matching funds, defined.

Matching funds means the funds provided toward investment at a project by the State of Nebraska pursuant to section 81-12,185.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 91.